Maryland, session 2026, SB0987.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
31–107.
(a) There is a Maryland Health Benefit Exchange Fund.
(e) The Fund consists of:
(2) all revenue deposited into the Fund that is received from the
distribution of:
(I) the premium tax under § 6–103.2 of this article; AND
(II) THE INCOME TAX UNDER § 2–605.4(2) OF THE TAX –
GENERAL ARTICLE;
(g) (6) (I) FUNDS RECEIVED FROM THE DISTRIBUTION OF THE
INCOME TAX REVENUE UNDER § 2–605.4(2) OF THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE MAY
BE USED ONLY FOR THE PURPOSE OF FUNDING HEALTH INSURANCE SUBSIDY
PROGRAMS, INCLUDING THE STATE–BASED HEALTH INSURANCE SUBSIDIES

SENATE BILL 987 3
PROGRAM AND THE STATE–BASED YOUNG ADULT HEALTH INSURANCE SUBSIDIES
PROGRAM.
(II) IN ORDER TO IMPROVE THE AFFORDABILITY OF HEALTH
INSURANCE COVERAGE, THE BOARD OF TRUSTEES OF THE MARYLAND HEALTH
BENEFIT EXCHANGE SHALL ALLOCATE FUNDS RECEIVED FROM THE DISTRIBUTION
OF THE INCOME TAX REVENUE UNDER § 2–605.4(2) OF THE TAX – GENERAL
ARTICLE BETWEEN HEALTH INSURANCE SUBSIDY PROGRAMS.
Article – Tax – General
2–605.4.
AFTER MAKING THE DISTRIBUTIONS REQUIRED UNDER §§ 2–604, 2–605,
2–605.1, 2–605.2, AND 2–605.3 OF THIS SUBTITLE, FROM THE REMAINING INCOME
TAX REVENUE FROM INDIVIDUALS, THE COMPTROLLER SHALL DISTRIBUTE THE
REVENUE ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE ADDITION MODIFICATION UNDER § 10–305(E) OF
THIS ARTICLE AS FOLLOWS:
(1) THE FIRST $5,000,000 TO THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF
HEALTH TO BE USED FOR MEDICAID ELIGIBILITY OPERATIONS; AND
(2) THE REMAINING REVENUE TO THE MARYLAND HEALTH BENEFIT
EXCHANGE FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 31–107 OF THE INSURANCE ARTICLE.
2–606.
(a) After making the distributions required under §§ 2–604 through [2–605.3]
2–605.4 of this subtitle, from the remaining income tax revenue from individuals, the
Comptroller shall distribute to an unallocated individual revenue account the income tax
revenue:
(1) with respect to which an income tax return is not filed; and
(2) that is attributable to:
(i) income tax withheld from salary, wages, or other compensation
for personal services under Title 10 of this article; or
(ii) estimated income tax payments by individuals.
10–305.

SENATE BILL 987
(a) To the extent excluded from federal taxable income, the amounts under this
section are added to the federal taxable income of a corporation to determine Maryland
modified income.
(E) (1) (I) IN THIS SUBSECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(II) “COVERED DRUG” MEANS:
1. A PRESCRIPTION DRUG PRODUCT AS DEFINED IN §
735 OF THE FEDERAL FOOD, DRUG, AND COSMETIC ACT; OR
2. A DRUG COMPOUNDED IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 503A
OR § 503B OF THE FEDERAL FOOD, DRUG, AND COSMETIC ACT.
(III) “COVERED ENTITY” MEANS:
1. A SPONSOR OF A PRESCRIPTION DRUG PRODUCT AS
DEFINED IN § 735 OF THE FEDERAL FOOD, DRUG, AND COSMETIC ACT; OR
2. A PERSON THAT, EITHER DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY
THROUGH A SUBSIDIARY, OWNS AN OUTSOURCING FACILITY AS DEFINED IN § 503B
OF THE FEDERAL FOOD, DRUG, AND COSMETIC ACT.
(IV) 1. “DIRECT–TO–CONSUMER ADVERTISING” MEANS ANY
DISSEMINATION, BY OR ON BEHALF OF A COVERED ENTITY, OF AN ADVERTISEMENT
THAT IS IN REGARD TO A COVERED DRUG AND PRIMARILY TARGETED TO THE
GENERAL PUBLIC, INCLUDING THROUGH:
A. BROADCASTING THROUGH MEDIA SUCH AS RADIO,
TELEVISION, TELEPHONE COMMUNICATION SYSTEMS, DIRECT MAIL, AND
BILLBOARDS; AND
B. DISSEMINATION ON THE INTERNET OR THROUGH
DIGITAL PLATFORMS, INCLUDING SOCIAL MEDIA, MOBILE MEDIA, WEB
APPLICATIONS, DIGITAL APPLICATIONS, MOBILE APPLICATIONS, AND ELECTRONIC
APPLICATIONS.
2. “DIRECT–TO–CONSUMER ADVERTISING” DOES NOT
INCLUDE AN ADVERTISEMENT MADE THROUGH PUBLICATION IN JOURNALS AND
OTHER PERIODICALS.
(2) THE ADDITION UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION
INCLUDES ANY EXPENSES PAID OR INCURRED DURING THE TAXABLE YEAR THAT ARE

SENATE BILL 987 5
DEDUCTED UNDER § 162 OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE FOR
DIRECT–TO–CONSUMER ADVERTISING OF COVERED DRUGS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Insurance
31–107.
(g) (6) (i) Funds received from the distribution of the income tax revenue
under § 2–605.4(2) of the Tax – General Article may be used only for the purpose of funding
health insurance subsidy programs, including [the State–Based Health Insurance
Subsidies Program and] the State–Based Young Adult Health Insurance Subsidies
Program.
(ii) In order to improve the affordability of health insurance
coverage, the Board of Trustees of the Maryland Health Benefit Exchange shall allocate
funds received from the distribution of the income tax revenue under § 2–605.4(2) of the
Tax – General Article between health insurance subsidy programs.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 2 of this Act shall take
effect on the taking effect of the termination provision specified in Section 2 or 3 of Chapter
468 of the Acts of the General Assembly of 2025. This Act may not be interpreted to have
any effect on that termination provision.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as provided in Section
3 of this Act, this Act shall take effect July 1, 2026, and shall be applicable to all taxable
years beginning after December 31, 2025.